Illinois, session 104th, SB1375.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 5amended by adding Section 65.135 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 947/65.135 new)7    Sec. 65.135. GROW Illinois Grant Pilot Program.8    (a) In this Section: 9    "Eligible applicant" means a student or prospective 10student enrolled at a participating public community college 11in this State who has yet to receive a certificate, license, or 12degree to work in a high-demand industry.13    "High-demand industry" means an industry identified by a 14public community college, in coordination with local 15employers, that is growing and where job placement is high.16    "Tuition and other necessary fees" includes the customary 17charge for instruction and use of facilities in general and 18the additional fixed fees charged for specified purposes that 19are required generally of non-grant recipients for each 20academic period for which the grant applicant actually 21enrolls, but does not include fees payable only once or 22breakage fees and other contingent deposits that are 23refundable in whole or in part.  SB1375- 2 -LRB104 04084 LNS 14108 b1    (b) Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, subject to 2a separate appropriation made for such purpose, the Commission 3shall, each year, receive and consider applications for grant 4assistance under a pilot program to be known as the Growing 5Regional Opportunities for Work (GROW) Illinois Grant Pilot 6Program. The Commission may award a grant under this Section 7to an eligible applicant if the Commission finds that the 8applicant meets all of the following qualifications:9        (1) The applicant is a resident of this State and a 10    citizen or eligible noncitizen of the United States.11        (2) The applicant has not yet received a certificate, 12    license, or degree to work in a high-demand industry.13        (3) The applicant is not incarcerated.14        (4) The applicant is not in default on any student 15    loan.16        (5) The applicant is enrolled or plans to enroll at a 17    public community college participating in the program in a 18    certificate, license, or degree program to work in a 19    high-demand industry.20        (6) Any other reasonable criteria, as determined by 21    the participating public community college.22    (c) Each community college participating in the program 23shall determine grant renewal criteria consistent with this 24Section. 25    (d) Each participating community college shall post on its 26Internet website the criteria and eligibility requirements to   SB1375- 3 -LRB104 04084 LNS 14108 b1receive an award of grant assistance under this Section. The 2information posted on the website must include the range of 3the amount of grant assistance that may be awarded to a 4qualified student. The criteria, eligibility requirements, and 5the amounts of the grant assistance available to students also 6must be reported to the Commission and the Illinois Community 7College Board. The Commission and the Illinois Community 8College Board shall post this information on their respective 9Internet websites.10    (e) Subject to appropriation, the Commission shall 11determine the allocation of funds available to each 12participating community college. The Commission shall allocate 13to the community college an amount proportional to the number 14of students who (i) are residents of this State, (ii) are 15citizens or eligible noncitizens of the United States, and 16(iii) were enrolled at the community college in the previous 17academic year.18    (f) Applications must be made to the Commission on or 19before a date determined by the Commission and on forms that 20the Commission shall provide to each participating community 21college. The form of the application and the information 22required shall be determined by the Commission. The 23information shall include, without limitation:24        (1) the total public community college funds used to 25    match funds received in the previous academic year from 26    the Commission under this Section;  SB1375- 4 -LRB104 04084 LNS 14108 b1        (2) the total number of students enrolled in the 2    previous academic year who are residents of this State; 3    and4        (3) any supporting documents that the Commission deems 5    necessary.6    (g) Each participating community college shall match the 7amount of funds received from the Commission with financial 8assistance for qualified students. The community college is 9not required to claim its entire allocation.10    (h) On a date determined by the Commission, the Commission 11shall make available to all participating community colleges 12the amount of unclaimed funds, if any. The unclaimed funds 13must be made available to those participating community 14colleges in the proportion determined under subsection (e), 15but must exclude from the calculation those participating 16community colleges that are not claiming their full 17allocations.18    (i) Each participating community college may determine the 19award amounts for qualified students on a per-student or 20collective basis. Subject to renewal eligibility, each renewal 21grant award may not be less than the amount awarded to the 22qualified student in the student's prior attendance at the 23participating community college under this Section. 24Notwithstanding this limitation, a renewal grant award may be 25reduced due to changes in the student's cost of attendance, 26including, but not limited to, if the student (i) reduces the   SB1375- 5 -LRB104 04084 LNS 14108 b1number of credit hours, (ii) changes the course of study in 2which the student is enrolled, or (iii) switches to a course of 3study with a lower tuition and fee rate. If an eligible 4applicant awarded grant assistance under this Section is 5eligible to receive other financial aid, the total grant aid 6to the student from all sources may not exceed the total cost 7of the course of study attendance at the participating 8community college in which the student is enrolled.9    (j) All money allocated to a public community college 10under this Section may be used only for financial assistance 11purposes for students attending the public community college. 12Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 13any funds received by a public community college under this 14Section that are not awarded to students in the academic year 15for which the funds are received may be retained by the public 16community college for expenditure on students participating in 17the program or students eligible to participate in the 18program.19    (k) Each participating community college must annually 20report to the Commission, on or before a date determined by the 21Commission, the number of students enrolled at that college 22who are residents of this State.23    (l) Nothing in this Section prohibits a public community 24college from using funds raised to be used as matching funds.25    (m) On or before a date determined by the Commission, each 26participating community college shall annually submit a report   SB1375- 6 -LRB104 04084 LNS 14108 b1to the Commission with all of the following information: 2        (1) The program's impact on tuition revenue and 3    enrollment goals and access and affordability at the 4    community college.5        (2) Total funds received by the community college 6    under the program.7        (3) Total amount of funds matched by the community 8    college.9        (4) Total amount of claimed and unexpended funds 10    retained by the community college.11        (5) The total number of students receiving grants from 12    the community college under the program, the students' 13    program of study, race, gender, income level, family size, 14    and zip code of residence, and the amount of each grant 15    award. This information shall include unit record data on 16    those students regarding variables associated with the 17    parameters of the program. 18    (n) On or before October 1, 2027 and annually thereafter, 19the Commission shall submit a report with the information 20under subsection (m) and any other information regarding the 21program to the Governor, the Speaker of the House of 22Representatives, the Minority Leader of the House of 23Representatives, the President of the Senate, and the Minority 24Leader of the Senate. The Commission's report may not 25disaggregate data to a level that may disclose personally 26identifying information of individual students.   SB1375- 7 -LRB104 04084 LNS 14108 b1    (o) The sharing and reporting of student data under this 2Section must be in accordance with the requirements of the 3federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974. All 4parties must preserve the confidentiality of the information 5as required by law. The names of the grant recipients under 6this Section are not subject to disclosure under the Freedom 7of Information Act. Public community colleges that fail to 8submit a report under subsection (m) or that fail to adhere to 9any other requirements under this Section may not be eligible 10for distribution of funds under the program for the next 11academic year, but may be eligible for distribution of funds 12for each academic year thereafter. 13    (p) The Commission may adopt any rules necessary to 14implement this Section, including rules concerning the 15computation of tuition and other necessary fees. 16    (q) This Section is repealed on October 1, 2031.  17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.